aghul_verbs.lexd
PATTERNS
Inf 
Neg? Imp CheckInf? Participle

PATTERN Inf
Neg? Imp > ((Stem1 > (StemPerf | CheckInf| (CheckInf StemPerf))) InfSuffix)

LEXICON Imp
акь

LEXICON InfSuffix
<inf>:c

LEXICON Stem1
:а

LEXICON Neg
<neg>:д

LEXICON StemPerf
<perf>:гуна

LEXICON CheckInf
<checkadv>:чукьа

LEXICON Participle
<futpres><particip><imperfective>:аф
<futpres><particip><perfective>:уф
<predpres><particip><perfective>:аеф
<predpres><particip><perfective>:унаеф
